Hawaii statutes.
[§431:8-329] Commissioner's
authority to grant waiver. Upon receiving a written request and a showing
of good cause, the commissioner may grant a waiver of any requirement of an
insurance law or rule as applied to an applicant or a producer. [L 2012, c 66,
pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next